Utah statutes.
65A-4-2.   Central index -- Division to maintain index of lands owned by agencies of the Department of Natural Resources -- Information to be furnished.

(1)  The division shall maintain a central index of all lands owned by agencies of the Department of Natural Resources and shall make that index available for the public.

(2)  All agencies of the Department of Natural Resources having any right, title, or interest in lands shall furnish the division with the following information:

(a)  legal description of the land;

(b)  when the land was acquired;

(c)  where the abstracts, deeds, or other indicia of interest in the property may be found;

(d)  name of agency acquiring or holding the mineral interest;

(e)  name of the grantor; and

(f)  nature of state's interest in the land including whether mineral interests were obtained.

(3)  This section does not apply to Board of Water Resources lands that are subject to a repurchase agreement by the water project sponsor.

